trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="hik/ke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ker</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kede</l>      <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kende</l>     <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eende</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nul/le__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lede</l>      <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lende</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="gem/me__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mede</l>      <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mende</l>     <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mis/se__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sede</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sende</l>     <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fr/yse__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yse</l>       <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yser</l>      <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yses</l>      <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øs</l>        <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osset</l>     <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysende</l>    <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="snur/re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rede</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rende</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Modal verbs -->

<pardef n="k/unne__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>unne</l>      <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unne</l>      <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnende</l>   <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnet</l>     <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sk/ulle__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>ulle</l>      <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulle</l>      <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ullet</l>     <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vil/le__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/urde__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>urde</l>      <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urde</l>      <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urdet</l>     <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="må/tte__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ttet</l>      <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

  </pardefs>

<e lm="burde">           <i>b</i><par n="b/urde__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="kunne">           <i>k</i><par n="k/unne__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="skulle">          <i>sk</i><par n="sk/ulle__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="måtte">           <i>må</i><par n="må/tte__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="ville">           <i>vil</i><par n="vil/le__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="fryse">           <i>fr</i><par n="fr/yse__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gemme">           <i>gem</i><par n="gem/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grille">          <i>gril</i><par n="nul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hikke">           <i>hik</i><par n="hik/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="le">              <i>l</i><par n="l/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="misse">           <i>mis</i><par n="mis/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nulle">           <i>nul</i><par n="nul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plukke">          <i>pluk</i><par n="hik/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="snurre">          <i>snur</i><par n="snur/re__vblex"/></e>
